Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1505
Commission; duties; rules and regulations.

(1) The commission
shall set a fair market price for the processing cost of deer donated to the
program. To set a fair market price, the commission shall consider prices
for similar deer processing services paid by retail customers in Nebraska
and nearby states and shall establish an annual per-deer processing payment
to be made to meat processors to the extent that money is available in the
Hunters Helping the Hungry Cash Fund.

(2) The commission
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the
program.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 9.